Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1725.01
Collection of taxes; real property; removal or demolition; public officials; duties; lien on personal property.

Except in any city or village that has adopted a building code with provisions for demolition of unsafe buildings or structures, it shall be the duty of any assessor, sheriff, constable, city council member, and village trustee to at once inform the county treasurer of the removal or demolition of or a levy of attachment upon any item of real property known to him or her. Except for property considered to be damaged real property as defined in section 77-1307, it shall be the duty of the county treasurer to immediately proceed with the collection of any delinquent or current taxes when such acts become known to him or her in any manner. Except for property considered to be damaged real property as defined in section 77-1307, the taxes shall be due and collectible, which taxes shall include taxes on all real property then assessed upon which the tax shall be computed on the basis of the last preceding levy, and a distress warrant shall be issued when (1) any person attempts to remove or demolish all or a substantial portion of his or her real property or (2) a levy of attachment is made upon the real property. From the date the taxes are due and collectible, the taxes shall be a first lien upon the personal property of the person to whom assessed until paid.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 137;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 110;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB501, § 5.